Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201581-3422.01
Project, defined.

Project means one or more related activities that require the practice of architecture or engineering for completion.

Laws 2011, LB45, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 21.
August 30, 2015